California statutes. Education Code
(5) The total number of successful course completions by course category disaggregated by participation in middle college high schools or programs, early college high schools or programs, College and Career Access Pathways, and
 other dual enrollment programs.

(6) Course and program outcomes for pupils who were enrolled in dual enrollment programs, disaggregated by grade level, gender, socioeconomic status, race and ethnicity, and other disproportionately impacted groups.

(f) It is the intent of the Legislature that, upon the implementation of the California Cradle-to-Career Data System established in Section 10860, future data and outcome reporting on dual enrollment programs shall be linked through, and conducted in accordance with, the privacy requirements of the California Cradle-to-Career Data System.

(g) For purposes of this article, “local educational agency” means a school district, charter school, county office of education, or regional occupational center or program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 250, Sec. 14.   (SB 133)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. A–G Completion Improvement Grant Program [41590. - 41590.]

41590.

(a) For the 2021–22 fiscal year, the sum of five hundred forty-seven million five hundred thirteen thousand dollars ($547,513,000) is hereby appropriated from the General Fund to the Superintendent for allocation for the A–G Completion Improvement Grant Program in the manner and for the purpose set forth in this section.

(b) The A–G Completion Improvement Grant Program is hereby established for the purpose of providing additional supports to local educational agencies to help increase the number of California high school pupils, particularly unduplicated pupils, who graduate from high school with A–G eligibility.

(c) (1) (A) For the 2021–22 fiscal year, the
 Superintendent shall allocate three hundred million dollars ($300,000,000) of the sum appropriated pursuant to subdivision (a), in an equal amount for every unduplicated pupil enrolled in grades 9 to 12, inclusive, as reported in the California Longitudinal Pupil Achievement Data System for the 2020–21 fiscal year Fall 1 Submission to each local educational agency that is identified by the department pursuant to subdivision (h) as having an overall A–G completion rate of less than 67 percent. A local educational agency that is otherwise eligible and is receiving concentration grant funding as of the second principal apportionment certification for the 2020–21 fiscal year shall receive a total allocation under this paragraph of not less than seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000). These funds are available for expenditure through the 2025–26 fiscal year. On or before September 30, 2026, each local educational agency receiving an allocation pursuant to this subparagraph shall report final expenditures to the
 department, which shall initiate collection of any unexpended funds. Any local educational agency that does not submit the final expenditure report shall forfeit all funds allocated pursuant to this subparagraph.

(B) The allocation under this paragraph shall be known as an A–G Access Grant.

(2) (A) For the 2021–22 fiscal year, the Superintendent shall allocate one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) of the sum appropriated pursuant to subdivision (a), in an equal amount for every unduplicated pupil enrolled in grades 9 to 12, inclusive, as reported in the California Longitudinal Pupil Achievement Data System for the 2020–21 fiscal year Fall 1 Submission to each local educational agency that is identified by the department pursuant to subdivision (h) as having an overall A–G completion rate of 67 percent or higher. A local educational agency that is
 otherwise eligible and is receiving concentration grant funding as of the second principal apportionment certification for the 2020–21 fiscal year shall receive a total allocation under this paragraph of not less than seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000). These funds are available for expenditure through the 2025–26 fiscal year. On or before September 30, 2026, each local educational agency receiving an allocation pursuant to this subparagraph shall report final expenditures to the department, which shall initiate collection of any unexpended funds. Any local educational agency that does not submit the final expenditure report shall forfeit all funds allocated pursuant to this subparagraph.

(B) The allocation under this paragraph shall be known as an A–G Success Grant.

(d) (1) A–G Access Grants and A–G Success Grants shall be used for activities that
 directly support pupil access to, and successful completion of, the A–G course requirements. Eligible activities may include, but are not limited to, any of the following:

(A) Providing teachers, administrators, and counselors with professional development opportunities to improve the local educational agency’s A–G completion rate.

(B) Developing comprehensive advising plans and pupil supports, including tutoring programs, to improve the local educational agency’s A–G completion rate.

(C) Expanding access to coursework or other opportunities to satisfy A–G course requirements to all pupils, including, but not necessarily limited to, unduplicated pupils. These opportunities may include, but shall not be limited to, course development, course review, incorporating A–G course requirements into the local educational
 agency’s graduation requirements, and new or expanded partnerships with other secondary or postsecondary educational institutions.

(D) Advanced Placement and International Baccalaureate fees for unduplicated pupils.

(2) The Legislature encourages local educational agencies to direct A–G Success Grant funds towards pupils in danger of not achieving a grade of “C” or better in A–G courses.

(e) (1) (A) For the 2021–22 fiscal year, the Superintendent shall allocate one hundred forty-seven million five hundred thirteen thousand dollars ($147,513,000) of the sum appropriated pursuant to subdivision (a), in an equal amount for every unduplicated pupil enrolled in grades 9 to 12, inclusive, as reported in the California Longitudinal Pupil Achievement Data System for the 2020–21
 fiscal year Fall 1 Submission to each local educational agency. A local educational agency that is otherwise eligible and is receiving concentration grant funding as of the second principal apportionment certification for the 2020–21 fiscal year shall receive a total allocation under this paragraph of not less than seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000). These funds are available for expenditure through the 2025–26 fiscal year. On or before September 30, 2026, each local educational agency receiving an allocation pursuant to this subparagraph shall report final expenditures to the department, which shall initiate collection of any unexpended funds. Any local educational agency that does not submit the final expenditure report shall forfeit all funds allocated pursuant to this subparagraph.

(B) The allocation under this subdivision shall be known as an A–G Learning Loss Mitigation Grant.

(2) (A) (i) A–G Learning Loss Mitigation Grants shall be used to allow pupils who receive a grade of “D,” “F,” or “Fail” in an A–G approved course in the spring semester of 2020 or the 2020–21 school year to retake those A–G courses.

(ii) The method of offering pupils the opportunity to retake courses provided in clause (i) shall be determined by the local educational agency.

(B) If sufficient funds are available after implementing subparagraph (A), a local educational agency may also use grant funds to offer credit recovery opportunities to all pupils to ensure pupils are able to graduate high school on time.

(f) A grant recipient shall develop a plan on or before April 1, 2022, describing how the funds received
 under this section will increase or improve services for unduplicated pupils to improve A–G eligibility, including information about the number of pupils identified for opportunities to retake courses pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (e). The plan shall include information regarding how the plan and described services supplement, and do not supplant, those services identified in the school district’s local control and accountability plan required pursuant to Section 52060, the county superintendent of schools’ local control and accountability plan required pursuant to Section 52066, or the charter school’s local control and accountability plan required pursuant to Section 47605 or 47605.6 and Section 47606.5, and the local educational agency’s learning recovery program plan adopted pursuant to Section 43522. The plan shall also include a description of the extent to which all pupils within the local educational agency, particularly unduplicated pupils, will have access to A–G courses approved by the
 University of California. In order to ensure community and stakeholder input, the plan shall be discussed at a regularly scheduled meeting by the governing board of the school district, county board of education, or governing body of the charter school and adopted at a subsequent regularly scheduled meeting. The plan adopted by the governing board or body shall be submitted to the Superintendent at the same time as the reported information required pursuant to subdivision (g).

(g) A grant recipient shall report to the Superintendent on or before December 31, 2023, on how they are measuring the impact of the funds received under this section on their A–G completion rate, as identified within their plan, and the outcomes based on those measurements. The department shall compile the information reported pursuant to this subdivision and submit a report to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature on or before April 30, 2024,
 and shall update the state board on the contents of that report at a regularly scheduled meeting of the state board. A grant recipient shall report to the Superintendent on or before August 31, 2026, on final outcomes that measure the impact of the funds received under this section on their A–G completion rate.

(h) The Superintendent shall annually post on the department’s internet website in an easily accessible location a list of each local educational agency’s and each individual high school’s A–G completion rate.

(i) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “A–G completion rate” means the percentage of pupils who have satisfied the A–G subject matter requirements for admission to the California State University and the University of California with a grade of “C” or better in each of the
 required courses upon graduation for the prior year.

(2) “A–G course” means a course that may be used to satisfy the A–G subject matter requirements for admission to the California State University and the University of California.

(3) “A–G eligibility” means the pupil has satisfied the A–G subject matter requirements for admission to the California State University and the University of California with a grade of “C” or better in each of the required courses.

(4) “Local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school.

(5) “Unduplicated pupil” has the same meaning as in Sections 42238.01 and 42238.02.

(j) For purposes of making the computations
 required by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the appropriation made by subdivision (a) shall be deemed to be “General Fund revenues appropriated for school districts,” as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 41202, for the 2020–21 fiscal year, and included within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIIIB,” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202, for the 2020–21 fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 38, Sec. 17.   (SB 153)   Effective June 29, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. State School Fund—Computation of Allowance [41600. - 41608.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [41600. - 41608.]

41600.

For the purposes of computing allowances and apportionments from the State School Fund for the advance apportionment, first principal apportionment, and second principal apportionment on the basis of average daily attendance:

(a) Each elementary school district shall be deemed to comprise the kindergartens and grades 1 to 8, inclusive, maintained by the district, and the seventh and eighth grades of the district not maintained by the district because of the attendance upon a junior high school of pupils who would otherwise attend upon seventh and eighth grades maintained by the district.

(b) Each high school district shall be deemed to comprise all of grades 9 to 12, inclusive, maintained within the high school district whether maintained by a high school district.

(c) Each unified school district shall be deemed to be an elementary school district comprising the kindergartens and grades 1 to 8, inclusive, maintained by the district and the seventh and eighth grades of the district not maintained by the district in elementary schools because of the attendance upon a junior high school of pupils who would otherwise attend the seventh and eighth grades maintained in elementary schools by the district, and a high school district comprising all of grades 9 to 12, inclusive.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

41601.

For purposes of this chapter, the governing board of each school district shall report to the Superintendent during each fiscal year the average daily attendance of the school district for all full school months during (1) the period between July 1 and December 31, inclusive, to be known as the “first period” report for the first principal apportionment, and (2) the period between July 1 and April 15, inclusive, to be known as the “second period” report for the second principal apportionment. Each county superintendent of schools shall report the average daily attendance for the schools and classes maintained by the county superintendent of schools and the average daily attendance for the county school tuition fund. Each report shall be prepared in accordance with instructions on forms prescribed and furnished by the Superintendent. Average daily
 attendance shall be computed in the following manner:

(a) The average daily attendance in the regular elementary, middle, and high schools, including continuation schools and classes, opportunity schools and classes, and special day classes, maintained by the school districts shall be determined by dividing the total number of days of attendance allowed in all full school months in each period by the number of days the schools are actually taught in all full school months in each period, excluding Saturdays or Sundays, excluding weekend makeup classes pursuant to Section 37223, and excluding weekend and intersession days that generated attendance through an attendance recovery program pursuant to Article 9 (commencing with Section 46210) of
 Chapter 2 of Part 26 of Division 4.

(b) The attendance for schools and classes maintained by a county superintendent of schools and the county school tuition fund shall be reported in the same manner as reported by school districts. The average daily attendance in special education classes operated by county superintendents of schools shall be determined in the same manner as all other attendance under subdivision (a). The average daily attendance in all other schools and classes maintained by the county superintendents of schools shall be determined by dividing the total number of days of attendance in all full school months in the first period by a divisor of 70, in the second period by 135, and at annual time by 175. For attendance in special classes and centers pursuant to Section 56364 or Section 56364.2, as applicable, the average daily attendance shall be reported by the county superintendents of schools, but credited for local control
 funding formula purposes to the school district in which the pupil resides.

(c) The days of attendance in classes for adults in correctional facilities shall be reported in the same manner as all other attendance under subdivision (a). The average daily attendance for adults in correctional facilities shall be determined by dividing the total number of days of attendance in all full school months in the first period by a divisor of 85, in the second period by 135, and at annual time by 175.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 8, Sec. 21.   (AB 121)   Effective June 27, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

41601.3.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, participation in on-the-job work experience education by a pupil enrolled in continuation education shall not be included in the determination of that pupil’s total days of attendance for the purposes of calculating average daily attendance pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 41601 unless the pupil is 18 years of age or less or has been continuously enrolled in a kindergarten to grade 12 program since his or her 18th birthday.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 66, Sec. 12.   Effective June 30, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

41601.5.

For any fiscal year, a school district with an increase in the number of units of average daily attendance from the second principal apportionment to the annual apportionment may request the county superintendent of schools to adjust the district’s revenue limit or block grant by utilizing the units of average daily attendance for the annual apportionment in lieu of the units of average daily attendance for the second principal apportionment. To qualify for this adjustment, the increase in the units of average daily attendance between the two periods shall meet the following requirements:

(a) The increase shall be equal to either paragraph (1) or (2):

(1) Equal to or greater than 2 percent.

(2) For the 1984–85 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, for school districts with less than 2,501 units of average daily attendance, equal to or greater than 10 units of average daily attendance.

(b) The increase shall be attributable to pupils of migrant agricultural workers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 910, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

41601.6.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Extended school year” means the period of time between the end of one school year and the beginning of the next school year.

(2) “Local educational agency” means a school district or county office of education.

(3) “Migratory pupil” has the same meaning as “currently migratory child” as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 54441.

(4) “School year” means that portion of the school year during which the
 regular school year is maintained, which must include not less than the number of days required to entitle the school district or county office of education to apportionments of state funds.

(b) (1) Commencing on January 1, 2024, to mitigate lost instruction time due to family movement related to migratory agricultural employment, up to two local educational agencies may request authorization from the department to provide an extended school year program to migratory pupils who, due to that family movement, enroll in kindergarten, including transitional kindergarten, or any of grades 1 to 6, inclusive, on or after March 1 of the school year
 and depart on or before December 1 of the next school year.

(2) If more than two local educational agencies request authorization pursuant to paragraph (1), the department shall establish a process to determine the two local educational agencies that will be authorized based on the ability of each local educational agency to provide a high-quality extended school year program consistent with this section.

(c) (1) Subject to paragraph (2), a local educational agency authorized to provide an extended school year program pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) may receive average daily attendance funding as specified in Section 46300 for those migratory pupils who meet the enrollment parameters described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) who are
 enrolled in the program. Average daily attendance shall also be available from P-2 through June 30 for qualifying migratory pupils. The local educational agency shall report to the department the average daily attendance attributable to those migratory pupils in the school year in which the extended school year program ends.

(2) To receive funding pursuant to paragraph (1), the local educational agency shall meet all of the following conditions:

(A) Enrollment for the extended school year program is limited to migratory pupils who meet the enrollment parameters described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b).

(B) The days of
 attendance for the extended school year program are the same length of time as the schoolday for pupils of the same grade level attending summer school in the local educational agency in which the extended school year program is provided, but not less than the minimum schoolday for that grade level.

(C) The extended school year program is comparable in standards, scope, and quality to the school year program offered during the regular school year.

(D) Instruction for the extended school year program is conducted in-person and is not independent study as specified in Article 5.5 (commencing with Section 51745) of Chapter 5 of Part 28 of Division 4.

(3) In addition to the funding described in paragraph (1), the local educational agency may supplement the extended school year program with funding appropriated for migrant children summer school programs pursuant to Section 54444.3 to offer additional days or hours of instruction, if the requirements for the migrant children summer school program are met.

(d) Local educational agencies may enter into memoranda of understanding for the purpose of transferring funds generated by the attendance of migratory pupils in multiple school districts to a local educational
 agency operating a program described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b).

(e) A local educational agency operating a program described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) shall annually report to the department, in a form and manner specified by the department, all of the following:

(1) The characteristics of pupils enrolled in the program.

(2) Academic and other support services provided through the program.

(3) Academic and other outcomes for pupils enrolled in the program.

(4) The financing for the program, including any other local, state, federal, or nongovernmental funding sources
 used.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 483, Sec. 2.   (AB 1777)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

41601.7.

A school district with an increase or decrease in the number of units of average daily attendance at a necessary small high school from the second principal apportionment to the annual apportionment may request the county superintendent of schools to adjust the district’s revenue limit or block grant by utilizing the units of average daily attendance for the annual apportionment for the necessary small high school in lieu of the units of average daily attendance for the second principal apportionment. To qualify for this adjustment, the following conditions shall be met:

(1) The increase or decrease in the units of average daily attendance between the two periods at the necessary small high school shall be equal to or greater than 15 percent and such increase or decrease shall be attributable to pupils attending a necessary small high school which provides a program of education with individualized instruction in a residential setting at an institution for pupils who have been placed in foster care for rehabilitation purposes pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 200) of Part 1 of Division 2 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(2) The school district reimburses the county superintendent of schools for the administrative costs of making the adjustment prescribed by this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1369, Sec. 1.   Effective October 1, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

41602.

The governing board of a school district affected by fluctuations in enrollments and attendance levels to a degree which will, in all likelihood, result in an actual total of average daily attendance for the fiscal year in excess of that shown in the second period report for the second principal apportionment provided for in Section 41601, may, with the approval of the Superintendent of Public Instruction, submit, in lieu of such second period report, a report of the estimated total average daily attendance for the fiscal year. The report shall be in the form prescribed by the Superintendent of Public Instruction, and shall be utilized for purposes of the second principal apportionment. If the average daily attendance of a district for the period of time between July 1 and June 30 exceeds the estimated total average daily attendance reported under this section, the appropriate increases and decreases in the several categories of attendance for which separate foundation programs are required to be computed shall be brought forward to the corresponding categories of the second period report for the next succeeding fiscal year. In the event the estimated total average daily attendance reported under this section exceeds the actual average daily attendance for the fiscal year, the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall withhold, pursuant to Section 41341, from apportionments made during the succeeding fiscal year, the amount of the excess moneys which may have been apportioned as a result thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 570.)
-------------------------------------------

41603.

The amounts computed as allowable to any school district for state equalization aid shall be reduced by fifty percent (50%) of miscellaneous funds, as defined in Section 41604. In no event shall the reduction exceed the total amount allowable as equalization aid to the school district for the fiscal year. For such purposes, miscellaneous funds, as defined in Section 41604, received by a unified school district, shall be allocated to the kindergarten and elementary, and high school grades, respectively, on the basis of the proportion of the district’s total average daily attendance in each such grade level, and the provisions of Section 41600 shall be applicable.

Should the amount of miscellaneous funds, as defined in Section 41604, actually received by a school district for any fiscal year be more or less than that reported to the Superintendent of Public Instruction, the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall during the fiscal year next succeeding withhold from or add to the apportionment made to the district from the State School Fund the amount of the excess or deficiency in the apportionment of state equalization aid from the State School Fund for the preceding year, if the amount of the excess or deficiency in such apportionment was one hundred dollars ($100) or more.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

41604.

“Miscellaneous funds” as used in Section 41603 means the amount the county superintendent of schools has determined and reported to the Superintendent of Public Instruction, in accordance with regulations the Superintendent of Public Instruction is hereby authorized to adopt, that the district has received and which has been deposited to the credit of the general fund of the district for a fiscal year on account of in-lieu taxes or income from bonuses or royalties. Federal forest reserve funds, potash and potassium royalties received pursuant to United States federal mineral deposits, and motor vehicle license fees distributed pursuant to Section 11003.4 of the Revenue and Taxation Code received by a district shall not be considered miscellaneous funds as defined by this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 714, Sec. 89.)
-------------------------------------------

41604.5.

Notwithstanding Section 41341, in order to avoid the cost of litigation to the state, the Superintendent of Public Instruction may negotiate a settlement with any local educational agency regarding prior year adjustments of miscellaneous funds received pursuant to Sections 41603 and 41604, if the funds were federal funds received in the 1979–80, 1980–81, or 1981–82 fiscal year as in-lieu of taxes due to the expansion of the Redwood National Park.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 839, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

41605.

If any computation made under, or necessitated by, Sections 41330 to 41343, inclusive, and Sections 41600 to 41972, inclusive and Sections 46300 to 46305 inclusive, results in an amount which is:

(a) Less than one dollar ($1), the amount shall be counted as one dollar ($1). 

(b) More than one dollar ($1) and includes a fraction of one-half dollar ($0.50) or more, the fraction shall be counted as one dollar ($1).

(c) More than one dollar ($1) and includes a fraction of less than one-half dollar ($0.50), the fraction shall not be counted.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

41606.

The term “elementary school district” as used in Section 41050, Sections 41330 to 41343, inclusive, and Sections 41600 to 41972, inclusive, Sections 46304 and 46305, whichever are in effect, means, unless expressly provided otherwise, each elementary school district which is composed of a single elementary school district and each union elementary school district, joint union elementary school district, or unified school district; and does not include any elementary school district included within a union elementary school district or a joint union elementary school district or a unified school district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

41607.

For the purposes of computation of allowances and apportionments from the State School Fund, under effective sections of this code, each elementary school district as defined by Section 41606, and each high school district merged or otherwise included within a unified school district shall be deemed a separate and independent district, but all apportionments from the State School Fund on account of any district merged or otherwise included within a unified school district shall be made to the unified school district and shall be available for expenditure by the unified school district for all schools and classes of the district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

41608.

For purposes of computation of allowances and apportionments from the State School Fund, whenever computations of apportionments based on average daily attendance are made for high school districts only the attendance in all classes of grades 9 to 12, inclusive, and in all types of ungraded classes that have been reported as attached to, or as a part of, a school that maintains any of grades 9 to 12, inclusive, shall be included.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 666, Sec. 27.   (AB 486)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Foundation Program [41760.2. - 41972.]



  ARTICLE 4. Computation of District Aid and Areawide Aid [41760.2. - 41760.2.]

41760.2.

On or before November 15 of each year, the county auditor of each county shall furnish to the Superintendent of Public Instruction the calculated amount of secured tax receipts, the calculated amount of unsecured tax receipts, estimated prior year tax receipts, and estimated timber tax receipts of each school district or portion of school district situated within his or her county. On or before August 15, after close of each fiscal year, the county auditor of each county shall furnish to the Superintendent of Public Instruction actual secured tax receipts, actual unsecured tax receipts, actual prior year tax receipts, actual timber tax receipts, and any other appropriate taxes or subventions of each school district or portion of school district situated within his or her county. This information shall be forwarded on forms prescribed by the Superintendent of Public Instruction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1354, Sec. 37.7.   Effective September 30, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Basic State Aid for Elementary School Districts [41790. - 41790.]

41790.

The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall allow one hundred twenty dollars ($120) to each elementary school district for each unit of average daily attendance therein during the fiscal year as computed for the district under Sections 46117 and 46333, but not less than two thousand four hundred dollars ($2,400) shall be allowed to any elementary school district, to be known as basic state aid.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 894.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Basic State Aid for High School Districts [41800. - 41800.]

41800.

The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall allow to each high school district one hundred twenty dollars ($120) for each unit of average daily attendance in the district during the fiscal year as computed under subdivision (a) of Section 41601, subject to the provisions of Section 41608, but not less than two thousand four hundred dollars ($2,400) shall be allowed to any high school district, to be known as basic state aid.

The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall exclude from the computation of allowances provided by this section the average daily attendance during the fiscal year of adults, as adults are defined in Section 52610, and of inmates of any state penal institution for adults or of any city, county, or city and county jail, road camp or farm for adults.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 756, Sec. 7.   Effective October 9, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Adjustment of Allowances [41830. - 41830.]

41830.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Articles 5, 6, and 7 (commencing with Sections 41790, 41800, and 41810, respectively) of this chapter, or any other provision of law to the contrary, if the computation made under Article 7 (commencing with Section 41810) of this chapter for any grade level maintained by a district, results in no allowance of equalization aid for such district for such grade level, the amount allowable therefor to such district under said Articles 5, 6, and 7 (commencing with Sections 41790, 41800, and 41810, respectively) of this chapter, per unit of the particular categories of average daily attendance used for such computations, shall be one hundred twenty dollars ($120) per unit of such average daily attendance during the preceding fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 894.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8.5. Continuous School Program [41835. - 41835.]

41835.

Each school district maintaining a continuous school program in any school within the district pursuant to Chapter 3 of Part 22 shall be entitled to receive the same support, but not more support, from the State School Fund due to the average daily attendance at that school that it would have received if the school had been operating under the provisions of law relating to the regular school year, including summer school.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1452, Sec. 333.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Computation of Allowances for Schools and Classes for Prisoners [41840. - 41841.8.]

41840.

A school district or county superintendent of schools may only claim average daily attendance for apportionment purposes for schools or classes maintained for adults in correctional facilities if those classes meet the requirements of Section 41976.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 666, Sec. 28.   (AB 486)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

41841.5.

(a) The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall allocate to each school district maintaining a secondary school or county superintendent of schools that offers adult education classes for adults in correctional facilities an amount equal to the actual current expense of the district or county superintendent of schools of maintaining those classes for the fiscal year. The amount so allowed for each unit of average daily attendance in these classes shall in no event exceed the statewide average revenue limit for adults multiplied by 0.8.
 However, for the 1993–94 and 1994–95 fiscal years, the amount so allowed to a district or county superintendent of schools for each unit of average daily attendance in classes for adults in correctional facilities shall in no event exceed the statewide average revenue limit at which adults in correctional facilities were funded in the 1992–93 fiscal year, as adjusted by any cost-of-living adjustment pursuant to Section 42238.1.

For the purposes of this section “correctional facilities” includes any county jail, county industrial farm, or county or joint county road camp.

Each school district or county superintendent of schools shall receive advanced apportionments as authorized by Sections 41330, 41332, and 41335 on the basis of the cost data report of the district for the preceding fiscal year and each district or county superintendent of schools shall file a preliminary cost data report based upon estimated current
 expenses.

For purposes of this section, the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall, by rules and regulations, establish minimum standards for the conduct of the adult education classes, including, but not necessarily limited to, attendance requirements and requirements concerning records to be kept and reports to be submitted.

(b) There is hereby appropriated from the General Fund to Section A of the State School Fund the following sums for the following fiscal years for the purposes of subdivision (a):(1)For the 1980-81 fiscal year $1,020,100(2)For the 1981-82
 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter $1,113,000Commencing with the 1982–83 fiscal year, the amounts in paragraph (2) shall be cumulatively increased by 6 percent, unless otherwise provided by law. Commencing with the 1990–91 fiscal year, the amounts in paragraph (2) shall be increased by the percentage change determined pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 42238.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 670, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

41841.6.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b) of Section 46191, for the 2000–01 fiscal year for purposes of Sections 1909 and 41841.5, in calculating the average daily attendance for schools or classes for adults in correctional facilities, a school district or county board of education may not claim or report any increase in average daily attendance in excess of the average daily attendance claimed and authorized pursuant to this article during the previous fiscal year multiplied by a factor of 1.025 to 1.14, as specified as
 follows:

(1) A school district or county office of education that has not experienced a loss of average daily attendance due to extenuating circumstances may not claim or report an increase in average daily attendance in excess of that authorized pursuant to this article during the previous fiscal year multiplied by 1.025.
